nl: Mondpijpmateriaal trompet: Goudmessing; Nieuwzilver; Roodmessing; Sterlingzilver; Geelmessing; Anders
pt-PT: Material do tubo de entrada do trompete: Latão dourado; Alpaca; Latão vermelho; Prata de lei; Latão amarelo; Outro
zh-CN: 小号吹口管材质: 金黄铜; 镍银; 红黄铜; 标准纯银; 黄铜; 其他
sk-SK: Materiál náustku na trúbku: Zlatá mosadz; Alpaka; Červená mosadz; Šterlingové striebro; Žltá mosadz; Iný
vi: Chất liệu ống thổi chính của kèn Trumpet: Đồng thau vàng kim; Niken bạc; Đồng thau đỏ; Bạc sterling; Đồng thau vàng; Khác
lt-LT: Trimito kandiklio vamzdžio medžiaga: Auksinis žalvaris; Naujasidabris; Raudonas žalvaris; Sterlingo sidabras; Geltonas žalvaris; Kita
de: Material des Trompeten-Mundrohrs: Goldmessing; Neusilber; Rotmessing; Sterlingsilber; Gelbmessing; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Материал на тръбата на тромпета: Златен месинг; Алпака; Червен месинг; Стерлингово сребро; Жълт месинг; Друг
pt-BR: Material do tubo de entrada da buzina: Latão dourado; Alpaca; Latão vermelho; Prata de lei; Latão amarelo; Outro
cs: Materiál vstupní trubice trubky: Zlatá mosaz; Alpaka; Červená mosaz; Sterlingové stříbro; Žlutá mosaz; Ostatní
ru: Материал мундштучной трубки трубы: Золотистая латунь; Нейзильбер; Красная латунь; Стерлинговое серебро; Желтая латунь; Другое
sv: Material för trumpetens leadpipe: Guldmässing; Nysilver; Rödmässing; Sterlingsilver; Gulmässing; Annat
sl-SI: Material ustnikovne cevi trobente: Zlata medenina; Novo srebro; Rdeča medenina; Srebro sterling; Rumena medenina; Drugo
tr: Trompet giriş borusu malzemesi: Altın pirinç; Nikel gümüş; Kırmızı pirinç; Som gümüş; Sarı pirinç; Diğer
ja: トランペットリードパイプ素材: ゴールドブラス; ニッケルシルバー; レッドブラス; スターリングシルバー; イエローブラス; その他
pl: Materiał rurki ustnikowej trąbki: Złoty mosiądz; Nowe srebro; Czerwony mosiądz; Srebro szterlingowe; Żółty mosiądz; Inne
es: Material del tudel de la trompeta: Latón dorado; Alpaca; Latón rojo; Plata de ley; Latón amarillo; Otro
ko: 트럼펫 리드파이프 소재: 골드 브라스; 니켈 실버; 레드 브라스; 스털링 실버; 옐로 브라스; 기타
ro-RO: Material al tubului principal pentru trompetă: Alamă aurie; Alpaca; Alamă roșie; Argint veritabil; Alamă galbenă; Altele
da: Materiale i trompetens leadpipe: Guldmessing; Nysølv; Rødmessing; Sterlingsølv; Gulmessing; Andet
hu: Trombita befúvócsövének anyaga: Aranyréz; Alpakka; Vörösréz; Sterling ezüst; Sárgaréz; Egyéb
hr-HR: Materijal vodilice trube: Zlatna mjed; Novo srebro; Crvena mjed; Sterling srebro; Žuta mjed; Ostalo
it: Materiale della bocchetta della tromba: Ottone dorato; Alpacca; Ottone rosso; Argento sterling; Ottone giallo; Altro
fi: Trumpetin suukappaleen materiaali: Kultamessinki; Uushopea; Punamessinki; Sterling-hopea; Keltamessinki; Muu
el: Υλικό σωλήνα εισαγωγής τρομπέτας: Χρυσός ορείχαλκος; Αλπακάς; Ερυθρός ορείχαλκος; Ασήμι 925; Κίτρινος ορείχαλκος; Άλλο
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำท่อลมของทรัมเป็ต: โกลด์บราส; นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; เรดบราส; เงินแท้; เยลโลบราส; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 小號吹口管材質: 金黃銅; 白銅; 紅黃銅; 925 純銀; 黃銅; 其他
nb: Materiale i trompetens munnrør: Gullmessing; Nysølv; Rødmessing; Sterlingsølv; Gulmessing; Annet
fr: Matériau du tube d'embouchure de la trompette: Laiton doré; Maillechort; Laiton rouge; Argent massif; Laiton jaune; Autre
en: Trumpet leadpipe material: Gold brass; Nickel silver; Red brass; Sterling silver; Yellow brass; Other